Maryland, session 2025, HB0400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
7–240.
(A) NEITHER THE STATE NOR ANY UNIT OR INSTRUMENTALITY OF THE
STATE MAY USE ANY APPROPRIATION FOR A MAGNETIC LEVITATION
TRANSPORTATION SYSTEM LOCATED OR TO BE LOCATED IN THE STATE.
(B) SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO EXPENDITURES
FOR THE SALARIES OF PERSONNEL ASSIGNED TO REVIEW PERMITS OR OTHER
FORMS OF APPROVAL FOR A MAGNETIC LEVITATION TRANSPORTATION SYSTEM.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0400*

HOUSE BILL 400
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2025.